California, session 20252026, AB2504.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 1.7 (commencing with Section 78026) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 1.7. Future of Creative Industries Pilot Program78026. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Future of Creative Industries Pilot Program.78026.1. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(b) “Future of Creative Industries Pilot Program” or “pilot program” means the program established pursuant to Section 78026.2.78026.2. (a) (1) The chancellor’s office shall establish the Future of Creative Industries Pilot Program.(2) The pilot program shall be developed in partnership with labor unions representing creative workers and with industry representatives.(3) The pilot program shall be developed to achieve all of the following goals:(A) Supporting workers in California’s creative and entertainment industries, including film, television, music, touring, and live events, who have been or are at risk of being displaced by generative artificial intelligence, including sound engineers, voice actors, concept artists, and employees in entry-level positions, by providing structured reskilling and upskilling opportunities through the California Community Colleges.(B) Ensuring that each participating community college district program is designed and implemented in meaningful partnership with labor unions representing creative workers and with industry representatives so that curriculum and training models reflect the real tools, conditions, and career pathways of the workforce being served.(C) Establishing a coordinated, outcomes-driven model that California Community Colleges and workforce systems can replicate across sectors facing artificial intelligence-driven employment disruption.(b) On or before June 30, 2027, the chancellor’s office shall establish eligibility criteria for community colleges seeking to apply to participate in the pilot program.(c) The pilot program shall be limited to up to 10 community college districts colleges statewide, to be selected by the chancellor’s office. In selecting community college districts colleges for participation in the pilot program, the chancellor’s office is encouraged to ensure that there is equitable access to the pilot program between the northern, central, and southern regions of the state.78026.3. Implementation of the pilot program for the selected community colleges shall commence on or before July 1, 2028.78026.4. (a) On or before January 1, 2032, the chancellor’s office shall submit a report to the Legislature evaluating the effectiveness of the pilot program at campuses maintained by community college districts colleges participating in the pilot program.(b) (1) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, the number of participants who completed the pilot program, a comprehensive list of the certificates or degrees awarded to participants who completed the pilot program, and outcomes and job placement rates of participants who completed the pilot program.(2) The data described in paragraph (1) shall be disaggregated by student demographics.(c) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include outcomes and legislative recommendations.(d) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.78026.5. This article shall become operative only upon an appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute for its purposes.78026.6. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.